Utah statutes.
20A-1-305.   Publication and distribution of election laws.

(1)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  publish a sufficient number of copies of Title 20A, Election Code, and any other provisions of law that govern elections; and

(b)  transmit copies to each county clerk.

(2)  Each county clerk shall:

(a)  inform the lieutenant governor of the number of copies needed; and

(b)  furnish each election officer in the county with one copy.

